New York, session 2025-2026, S43.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The environmental conservation law is amended by adding a 2 new section 16-0121 to read as follows: 3 § 16-0121. Shoreline hardening. 4 1. For purposes of this section, the following terms shall have the 5 following meanings: 6 (a) "Shoreline" shall mean the line along which a large body of water 7 meets the land. 8 (b) "Shoreline resident" or "resident" shall mean any resident of the 9 state who owns property which is situated on a shoreline on Lake Ontario 10 or the St. Lawrence River which is prone to flooding. 11 (c) "Shoreline hardening" shall mean the process of adding materials 12 or structures to property located on a shoreline on Lake Ontario or the 13 St. Lawrence River in order to minimize damage caused by flooding. 14 2. (a) The department shall provide oversight and assist with the 15 implementation of shoreline hardening construction plans for shoreline 16 residents along Lake Ontario and the St. Lawrence river. Shoreline resi- 17 dents shall work in conjunction with the department to develop a design 18 plan for each property located on a shoreline along Lake Ontario and the 19 St. Lawrence river. Such design plan shall be subject to final approval 20 by the department prior to any construction work being commenced on a 21 property. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD00114-01-5 S. 43 2 1 (b) The department shall be responsible for assisting and providing to 2 shoreline residents all necessary and required permits for all approved 3 shoreline hardening proposals. 4 3. (a) Each shoreline resident shall be responsible for the costs 5 related to the implementation of their approved shoreline hardening 6 plan. 7 (b) After a shoreline hardening plan has been implemented and 8 completed, the department shall ensure the completed work complies with 9 the department's approved plan. 10 (c) If the department determines that the approved plans for shoreline 11 hardening have been satisfied, the department shall provide reimburse- 12 ment to each resident for up to fifty percent of such resident's shore- 13 line hardening costs. 14 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately.